Hawaii statutes.
§666-20 Rent control ordinances.
Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to authorize the eviction of a tenant
contrary to any rent control ordinance declaring an emergency arising out of a
housing shortage and prohibiting termination of tenancies or restricting the
grounds for termination thereof, pursuant to the powers conferred by section
62-34(11) and section 70-65, so long as such emergency continues. [L 1943, c
102, §4; RL 1945, §10418; RL 1955, §240-20; HRS §666-20]

Note

Sections 62-34 and 70-65 referred to in text are repealed.

Cross References

General powers and limitations of the counties, see §46-1.5.

Case Notes

Eviction for occupancy by landlord. 36 H. 711 (1940).

Validity of provisions of rent control ordinance limiting
grounds for termination of tenancy. 37 H. 252 (1945).

Recovery of housing used illegally for commercial purposes.
38 H. 250 (1948).

Existence of emergency. 43 H. 84 (1958).

Cited: 37 H. 294 (1946).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next